Wyoming, session 2025, HB0006.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-22-402(a)(i) is amended to read:

35-22-402. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Advance health care directive" means an
individual instruction or a power of attorney for health
HB0006

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0216
care, or both.; The term includes, but is not limited to,
directives for dementia as follows:

(A) Dementia directives that provide
individual instruction for health care decisions to address
the gradual cognitive decline of a person who has been
diagnosed with dementia. Dementia directives may include
directions for health care decisions during each stage of
dementia regarding the care to be rendered at each stage of
the disease. Dementia directives may be used to augment a
person's other advance health care directives in accordance
with this article.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0006